District of Columbia statutes.
16-4425

Judgment on award; attorney’s fees and litigation expenses.

(a)

Upon granting an order confirming, vacating without directing a rehearing, modifying, or correcting an award, the court shall enter a judgment in conformity therewith. The judgment may be recorded, docketed, and enforced as any other judgment in a civil action.

(b)

A court may allow reasonable costs of the motion and subsequent judicial proceedings.

(c)

On application of a prevailing party to a contested judicial proceeding under § 16-4422, 16-4423, or 16-4424, the court may add reasonable attorney’s fees and other reasonable expenses of litigation incurred in a judicial proceeding after the award is made to a judgment confirming, vacating without directing a rehearing, modifying, or correcting an award.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847
This section is referenced in § 16-4404.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 25 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).